District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.12

Dual capacity.

A person may have a patron member’s interest and an investor member’s interest. When such person acts as a patron member, the person shall be subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing patron members. When such person acts as an investor member, the person shall be subject to this chapter and the organic rules governing investor members.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 116 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.